Utah statutes.
10-8-24.   Litter in streets.

They may regulate and prevent the throwing or depositing of ashes, offal, dirt, garbage or any offensive matter in, and prevent injury or obstruction to, any street, sidewalk, avenue, alley, park or public ground.

